Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5326.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 8. (1) Subject to subsection (3), a police officer may
intercept, disable, or destroy an unmanned aircraft that is flying
in a manner that poses a risk to public safety or that is flying in
violation of federal law or Federal Aviation Administration
guidelines.
(2) A police officer who intercepts, disables, or destroys an
unmanned aircraft under subsection (1) is not liable to the owner
of the unmanned aircraft for damage to the unmanned aircraft.
(3) Subsection (1) applies only to a police officer who
JJR H03007'25 (H-2) 9m3pdn


completes federally approved training and certification procedures
for exercising the authority described in subsection (1).
(4) This section applies only to the extent that this section
is not preempted by federal law.
Final Page
JJR H03007'25 (H-2) 9m3pdn